Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 2. Wages and Medium of Payment

§ 341.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Employee” means a person who has entered into the employment of an employer, where the employer is unable to show that:

the individual has been and will continue to be free from control or direction over the performance of such services, both under the contract of service and in fact; and

the service is either outside all the usual course of business for which such service is performed, or outside all the places of business of the enterprise for which such service is performed; and

the individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession, or business.

“Employer” means any person having employees in his or her service.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.

“Department” means the Department of Labor.

“Wages” means all remuneration payable for services rendered by an employee, including salary, commissions, and incentive pay.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 198

, § 1;

1995, No. 184

(Act. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 15

, § 1.

§ 342.
Weekly payment of wages.

Any employer having one or more employees doing and transacting business within the State shall pay each week, in lawful money or checks, the wages earned by each employee to a day not more than six days prior to the date of such payment.
(a) (1) Any employer having one or more employees doing and transacting business within the State shall pay each week, in lawful money or checks, the wages earned by each employee to a day not more than six days prior to the date of such payment.

After giving written notice to the employee or employees, any employer having an employee or employees doing and transacting business within the State may, notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, pay biweekly or semimonthly in lawful money or checks each employee the wages earned by the employee to a day not more than six days prior to the date of the payment. If a collective bargaining agreement so provides, the payment may be made to a day not more than 13 days prior to the date of payment.

A school district employee may elect in writing to have a set amount or set percentage of his or her after-tax wages withheld by the school district in a district-held bank account each pay period. The percentage or amount withheld shall be determined by the employee. At the option of the employee, the school district shall disburse the funds to the employee in either a single payment at the time the employee receives his or her final paycheck of the school year, or in equal weekly or biweekly sums beginning at the end of the school year. The school district shall disburse funds from the account in any sum as requested by the employee and, at the end of the school year or at the employee’s option over the course of the period between the current and next school year, or upon separation from employment, shall remit to the employee any remaining funds, including interest earnings, held in the account. For employees within a bargaining unit organized pursuant to either chapter 22 of this title or 16 V.S.A. chapter 57, the school district shall implement this election in a manner consistent with the provisions of this subdivision and as determined through negotiations under those chapters. For employees not within a bargaining unit, the school district shall, in a manner consistent with this subdivision, determine the manner in which to implement this subdivision.

An employee who:

voluntarily leaves employment shall be paid on the last regular pay day, or if there is no regular pay day, on the following Friday;

is discharged from employment shall be paid within 72 hours of discharge;

is absent from his or her regular place of employment on the employer’s regular scheduled date of wages or salary payment shall be entitled to payment upon demand.

With the written authorization of an employee, an employer may pay wages due the employee by any of the following methods:

Deposit through electronic funds transfer or other direct deposit systems to a checking, savings, or other deposit account maintained by or for the employee in any financial institution within or without the State.

Credit to a payroll card account directly or indirectly established by an employer in a federally insured depository institution to which electronic fund transfers of the employee’s wages, salary, or other employee compensation is made on a recurring basis, other than a checking, savings, or other deposit account described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided all the following:

The employer provides the employee written disclosure in plain language, in at least 10-point type of both the following:

All the employee’s wage payment options.

The terms and conditions of the payroll card account option, including a complete list of all known fees that may be deducted from the employee’s payroll card account by the employer or the card issuer and whether third parties may assess fees in addition to the fees assessed by the employer or issuer.

Copies of the written disclosures required by subdivisions (A) and (F) of this subdivision (c)(2) and by subsection (d) of this section shall be provided to the employee in the employee’s primary language or in a language the employee understands.

The employee voluntarily consents in writing to payment of wages by payroll card account after receiving the disclosures described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (c)(2), and this consent is not a condition of hire or continued employment.

The employer ensures that the payroll card account provides that during each pay period, the employee has at least three free withdrawals from the payroll card, one of which permits withdrawal of the full amount of the balance at a federally insured depository institution or other location convenient to the place of employment.

None of the employer’s costs associated with the payroll card account are passed on to the employee, and the employer shall not receive any financial remuneration for using the pay card at the employee’s expense.

At least 21 days before any change takes effect, the employer provides the employee with written notice in plain language, in at least 10 point type, of the following:
(F) (i) At least 21 days before any change takes effect, the employer provides the employee with written notice in plain language, in at least 10 point type, of the following:

any change to any of the terms and conditions of the payroll card account, including any changes in the itemized list of fees;

the employee’s right to discontinue receipt of wages by a payroll card account at any time and without penalty.

The employer may not charge the employee any additional fees until the employer has notified the employee in writing of the changes.

The employer provides the employee the option to discontinue receipt of wages by a payroll card account at any time and without penalty to the employee.

The payroll card issued to the employee shall be a branded-type payroll card that complies with both the following:

Can be used at a PIN-based or a signature-based outlet.

The payroll card agreement prevents withdrawals in excess of the account balance and to the extent possible protects against the account being overdrawn.

The employer ensures that the payroll card account provides one free replacement payroll card per year at no cost to the employee before the card’s expiration date. A replacement card need not be provided if the card has been inactive for a period of at least 12 months or the employee is no longer employed by the employer.

(J)

A nonbranded payroll card may be issued for temporary purposes and shall be valid for no more than 60 days.

(K)

The payroll card account shall not be linked to any form of credit, including a loan against future pay or a cash advance on future pay.

(L)

The employer shall not charge the employee an initiation, loading, or other participatory fee to receive wages payable in an electronic fund transfer to a payroll card account, with the exception of the cost required to replace a lost, stolen, or damaged payroll card.

(M)

The employer shall ensure that the payroll card account provides to the employee, upon the employee’s written or oral request, one free written transaction history each month which includes all deposits, withdrawals, deductions, or charges by any entity from or to the employee’s payroll card account for the preceding 60 days. The employer shall also ensure that the account allows the employee to elect to receive the monthly transaction history by electronic mail.

If a payroll card account is established with a financial institution as an account that is individually owned by the employee, the employer’s obligations and the protections afforded under subsection (c) of this section shall cease 30 days after the employer-employee relationship ends and the employee has been paid his or her final wages.
(d) (1) If a payroll card account is established with a financial institution as an account that is individually owned by the employee, the employer’s obligations and the protections afforded under subsection (c) of this section shall cease 30 days after the employer-employee relationship ends and the employee has been paid his or her final wages.

Upon the termination of the relationship between the employer and the employee who owns the individual payroll card account:

the employer shall notify the financial institution of any changes in the relationship between the employer and employee; and

the financial institution holding the individually owned payroll card account shall provide the employee with a written statement in plain language describing a full list of the fees and obligations the employee might incur by continuing a relationship with the financial institution.

The Department of Financial Regulation may adopt rules to implement subsection (c) of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 198

, § 2;

1977, No. 44

, § 1, eff. April 19, 1977;

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 1, 1978;

1979, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 21, 2010;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2011, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 15

, § 2.

§ 342a.
Investigation of complaints of unpaid wages.

An employee or the Department on its own motion may file a complaint that wages have not been paid to an employee, not later than two years from the date the wages were due. The Commissioner shall provide notice and a copy of the complaint to the employer by service, or by certified mail sent to the employer’s last known address, together with an order to file a response to the specific allegation in the complaint filed by the employee or the Department with the Department within 10 calendar days of receipt.

The Commissioner shall investigate the complaint, and may examine the employer’s records, enter and inspect the employer’s business premises, question such employees, subpoena witnesses, and compel the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records necessary and material to investigate the complaint. If a person fails to comply with any lawfully issued subpoena, or a witness refuses to testify to any matter on which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the Commissioner may seek an order from the Civil Division of the Superior Court compelling testimony or compliance with the subpoena.

If after the investigation wages are found to be due, the Commissioner shall attempt to settle the matter between the employer and employee. If the attempt fails, the Commissioner shall issue a written determination and order for collection, which shall specify the facts and the conclusions upon which the determination is based. The Department shall collect from the employer the amounts due and remit them to the employee. Notice of the determination and the order for collection to the employer shall be provided to all interested parties by certified mail or service.

If the Commissioner determines that the unpaid wages were willfully withheld by the employer, the order for collection may provide that the employer is liable to pay an additional amount not to exceed twice the amount of unpaid wages, one-half of which will be remitted to the employee and one-half of which shall be retained by the Commissioner to offset administrative and collection costs.

Within 30 days after the date of the collection order, the employer or employee may file an appeal from the determination to a departmental administrative law judge. The appeal shall, after notice to the employer and employee, be heard by the administrative law judge within a reasonable time. The administrative law judge shall review the complaint de novo, and after a hearing, the determination and order for collection shall be sustained, modified, or reversed by the administrative law judge. Prompt notice in writing of the decision of the administrative law judge and the reasons for it shall be given to all interested parties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the employer or employee may appeal the decision of the administrative law judge within 30 days by filing a written request with the Employment Security Board. The appeal shall be heard by the Board after notice to the employee and employer. The Board may affirm, modify, or reverse the decision of the administrative law judge solely on the basis of evidence in the record or any additional evidence it may direct to be taken. Prompt notice of the decision of the Board shall be given to the employer and employee in the manner provided by section 1357 of this title. The Board’s decision shall be final unless an appeal to the Supreme Court is taken. Testimony given at any hearing upon a complaint of unpaid wages shall be recorded, but the record need not be transcribed unless ordered. The costs of transcription shall be paid by the requesting party.

The Commissioner may enforce a final order for collection under this section within two years of the date of the final order in the Civil Division of the Superior Court.

Subsection (h) effective until July 1, 2026; see also subsection (h) effective July 1, 2026 set out below.

Information obtained from any employer, employee, or witness in the course of investigating a complaint of unpaid wages shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed or open to public inspection in any manner that reveals the employee’s or employer’s identity or be admissible in evidence in any action or proceeding other than one arising under this subchapter. However, such information may be released to any public official for the purposes provided in subdivision 1314(e)(1) of this title or to the Attorney General in relation to investigations conducted pursuant to section 346 of this subchapter as provided pursuant to the terms of the memorandum of understanding between the Attorney General and the Commissioner of Labor executed pursuant to section 3 of this title.

(h)

Subsection (h) effective July 1, 2026; see also subsection (h) effective until July 1, 2026 set out above.

Information obtained from any employer, employee, or witness in the course of investigating a complaint of unpaid wages shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed or open to public inspection in any manner that reveals the employee’s or employer’s identity or be admissible in evidence in any action or proceeding other than one arising under this subchapter. However, such information may be released to any public official for the purposes provided in subdivision 1314(e)(1) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 182

; amended

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 1, 1978;

1999, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. May 18, 2000;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2013, No. 15

, § 3;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Feb. 20, 2020;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. July 1, 2026.

§ 342b.
Repealed. 1999, No. 119 (Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 18, 2000.

§ 343.
Form of payment.

An employer shall not pay employees with any form of evidence of indebtedness, including all scrip, vouchers, due bills, or store orders, unless the employer is in compliance with one or both of the following:

The employer is a cooperative corporation in which the employee is a stockholder, in which case, the cooperative corporation shall, upon request of any shareholding employee, pay the shareholding employee as provided in section 342 of this title.

Payment is made by check as defined in Title 9A or by an electronic fund transfer as provided in section 342 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 1, 1978;

2009, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 21, 2010.

§ 344.
Assignment of future wages.

An assignment of future wages payable under the provisions of section 342 of this title shall not be valid, if made to the employer from whom such wages are to become due, or to anyone in behalf of such employer, or if made or procured to be made to anyone for the purpose of relieving such employer from the obligation to pay under the provisions of section 342. Such employer shall not require an agreement from an employee to accept wages at any other period as a condition of employment.

§ 345.
Nonpayment of wages and benefits.

Each employer who violates section 342, 343, 482, or 483 of this title shall be fined not more than $5,000.00. Where the employer is a corporation, the president or other officers who have control of the payment operations of the corporation shall be considered employers and liable to the employee for actual wages due when the officer has willfully and without good cause participated in knowing violations of this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty or punishment otherwise prescribed by law, any employer who, pursuant to an oral or written employment agreement, is required to provide benefits to an employee shall be liable to the employee for actual damages caused by the failure to pay for the benefits, and where the failure to pay is knowing and willful and continues for 30 days after the payments are due shall be assessed a civil penalty by the Commissioner of not more than $5,000.00.

The Commissioner may enforce collection of the fines assessed under this section in the Civil Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 188

, § 1;

2013, No. 15

, § 4;

2015, No. 69

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2017, No. 74

, § 33.

§ 345a.
Repealed. 2013, No. 15, § 5.

§ 346. Section 346 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Enforcement by Attorney General; employee misclassification.

Following the referral of a complaint by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title, the Attorney General may investigate a complaint that an employer has committed a willful, substantial, or systemic violation of section 342, 343, 348, 482, or 483 of this chapter by misclassifying an employee as an independent contractor and may enforce those provisions by restraining prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance, and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

as though the misclassification of an employee is an unfair act in commerce. Any employer complained against shall have the same rights and remedies as specified in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

. The Superior Court may impose the same civil penalties and investigation costs and order other relief to the State of Vermont or an aggrieved employee for the misclassification of an employee and any related violations of the provisions of this chapter as they are authorized to impose or order under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458 and 2461 in an unfair act in commerce. In addition, the Superior Court may order restitution of wages or other benefits on behalf of an employee and may order reinstatement and other appropriate relief on behalf of an employee.

The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.
(b) (1) The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.

Upon receiving notice that the Attorney General has determined that an employer has committed a violation of section 342, 343, 348, 482, or 483 of this chapter by misclassifying an employee as an independent contractor, the Commissioners of Financial Regulation and of Taxes shall review whether the employer is in compliance with the insurance or tax laws that are under their jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Feb. 20, 2020; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 216; repealed on July 1, 2026 by

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(b).

§ 347.
Forfeiture.

An employer who violates section 342 or 343 of this title shall forfeit to the individual injured twice the value thereof, to be recovered in a civil action, and all costs and reasonable attorney’s fees. However, an action may not be maintained under this section unless at the time the action is brought, the wages remain unpaid or improperly paid.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 1, 1978;

1979, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 15

, § 6.

§ 348.
Retaliation prohibited.

An employer shall not discharge or in any other manner retaliate against an employee because:

the employee lodged a complaint of a violation of this subchapter;

the employee has cooperated with the Commissioner in an investigation of a violation of this subchapter; or

the employer believes that the employee may lodge a complaint or cooperate in an investigation of a violation of this subchapter.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court seeking compensatory and punitive damages or equitable relief, including restraint of prohibited acts, restitution of wages or benefits, reinstatement, costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other appropriate relief.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 15

, § 8.